Utah statutes.
32A-5-106 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Bond.
(1)  Each club licensee shall post a cash or corporate surety bond in the
penal sum of $10,000 payable to the department, which the club licensee has
procured and must maintain for so long as the club licensee continues to
operate as a club licensee.
(2)  The bond shall be in a form approved by the attorney general, conditioned
upon a club licensee's faithful compliance with this title and the rules of
the commission.
(3) (a)  If a $10,000 corporate surety bond is canceled due to a club
licensee's negligence, a $300 reinstatement fee may be assessed.
(b)  No part of any cash or corporate bond posted under this section may be
withdrawn:
(i)  during the period the club license is in effect; or
(ii)  while revocation proceedings are pending against the club licensee.
(c)  A bond filed by a club licensee may be forfeited if the club license is
finally revoked.
